Alaska statutes. Title 43. Revenue and Taxation.
Article 3. Service of Process on Nonresident Businesses.

Collateral references. —

71 Am. Jur. 2d, State and Local Taxation, §§ 190-202.

Sec. 43.10.160.
Filing statement and tax bond with department. [Repealed, § 2 ch 93 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 43.10.170.
Agent for service of process.

Every nonresident person shall, as a condition precedent to severing or taking resources or transacting or doing business in the state, file with the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development a duly executed and notarized instrument appointing the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development the agent upon whom all original process may be served in any action or legal proceeding resulting from the taxpayer’s failure or neglect to pay state taxes or license fees, and agreeing that service of the original process against the nonresident taxpayer is of the same effect as if personally served on the nonresident taxpayer in the state.

The service of process shall be made by leaving a copy with the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development. If legal action is instituted against the nonresident taxpayer, the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development shall immediately notify the nonresident by sending a copy of the process by registered letter to the last known address of the taxpayer.

If a nonresident taxpayer fails to appoint the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development as agent for service of process, service may nevertheless be made upon the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development, who shall then transmit a copy of the process by registered mail to the last known address of the taxpayer, and this service is binding to the same effect as if personally served on the nonresident taxpayer in the state.

History.

(§ 3 ch 71 SLA 1955; am § 2 ch 143 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, throughout this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Secs. 43.10.180 — 43.10.200.
Proceedings against bond; intent of AS 43.10.160 — 43.10.200; penalties. [Repealed, § 2 ch 93 SLA 1997.]